District of Columbia statutes.
38-826.05

Tobacco-free school campuses.

(a)

Tobacco and tobacco products are prohibited in public school and public charter school buildings, grounds, parking lots, parking garages, playing fields, school buses and other vehicles, and at off-campus, school-sponsored events.

(b)

For a public charter school located in a mixed-use facility, the requirements of subsection (a) of this section shall apply only to the buildings, grounds, parking lots, garages, and fields under the control of the public charter school.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 604a
as added Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-37, § 2(n), 58 DCR 6841
Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-37 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. This act shall apply as of August 15, 2011.”